Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.400

Organization—Election of officers—Term.

The first election of commissioners shall be held at the next special election that occurs at least sixty days after the election results are certified where the proposition to organize under the commission form was approved by city voters, and the commission first elected shall commence to serve as soon as they have been elected and have qualified and shall continue to serve until their successors have been elected and qualified and have assumed office in accordance with RCW 29A.60.280. The date of the second election for commissioners shall be in accordance with RCW 29A.04.330 such that the term of the first commissioners will be as near as possible to, but not in excess of, four years calculated from the first day in January in the year after the year in which the first commissioners were elected.

[ 2015 c 53 s 31; 1994 c 223 s 11; 1979 ex.s. c 126 s 18; 1965 c 7 s 35.17.400. Prior: 1963 c 200 s 13; 1955 c 55 s 10; prior: 1943 c 25 s 1, part; 1911 c 116 s 3, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9092, part.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1979 ex.s. c 126: See RCW 29A.60.280(1).